Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.875

Laboratory services for the analyzing of samples, public agencies may contract with college for.

Local law enforcement agencies or such other public agencies that shall be in need of such service may contract with any community or technical college for laboratory services for the analyzing of samples that chemists associated with such colleges may be able to perform under such terms and conditions as the individual college may determine.

Employees of the Seattle Vocational Institute are exempt from this section until July 1, 1993.

[ 1991 c 238 s 73; 1969 ex.s. c 261 s 35. Formerly RCW 28.85.875.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 261: See note following RCW 28B.50.020.